District of Columbia statutes.
29-608.04

Partner’s power to bind partnership after dissolution.

Subject to § 29-608.05, a partnership shall be bound by a partner’s act after dissolution that:

(1)

Is appropriate for winding up the partnership activities and affairs; or

(2)

Would have bound the partnership under § 29-603.01 before dissolution, if the other party to the transaction did not have notice of the dissolution.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(8)(E), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-608.02, § 29-608.05, and § 29-608.06.
1981 Ed., § 41-158.4.
2001 Ed., § 33-108.04.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “business” in (1).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 804 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.